Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-4407
Licensed behavior analyst, defined.

Licensed behavior analyst means an individual who meets the requirements specified in section 38-4410 and who is issued a license as a licensed behavior analyst under the Behavior Analyst Practice Act by the department.

Laws 2023, LB227, § 7.